hyphenate_patterns/hyph-uk.tex
моко3
мо3нт
мо3о4
моп2
мос3ф
2м1п
мп3л
мпос3
4мп3р
м1р
м2ре
2мро
2м1с
5мсў
4мсо
4мст
мс2та
4мсь
м1т
4мт.
1му.
мут3р
м1ф
4мф.
3м1ц
м1ч
м1ш
4мш.
м1щ
2мя
м'я3с
5на.
наб2л
наб2ра
нав2д
на3вк
нав2чу
наг4
3над
над5в
на2дл
на2дра
на2дч
на∙3м
на∙3с
най3д
на1йт
нант3
нао4
нап2
нар2в
3нас2
нас4п
нат2р
нах2
наш4
н1б
3нбл
2н1в
3нви
2н1г
4нг.
4нгўд
2н1є
2н1д
н3дб
нде2с
нд2ж
4ндр.
н3дсп
н3дь
4ндь.
3не.
неб2л
3нев
нев2ч
нег1р
нег3рў
не3д4
нед2о
нед2р
не3з4
не∙2
нео4б
не1од
нео2ну
не1оп
неос4
не1оц
неп2
нес2
нес4п
нет4в
не3т2л
нет2р
н1ж
2нж.
н1з
2нз.
3нзе
5ний
нўб2
нў3вр
нў2ла
нў2мк
нў3мн
2н1ўнс5
нўр3в
2н1ў2сл
3нўф
2н1к
нк2в
нк1л
н2км
н2кн
нкоб2
нкос2
2н1л
4нля
2н1м
3нму
4н3н
нн2ў
н4нс
но1
ноб2р
3нов
нов2ж
ное4
2нож
ноз4д
3нор
нос4л
ност4
нос2то
нос2тр
2н1о2тц
2н1о2тч
ноут4в
ноф2
нош4к
н1п
3нпа
н1р
2нр.
2н1с
н2с1аг
н2с1ак
нс1арк
н2с1в
н4ск
нско3
н2с3л
н3с4ла
н3с4ло
н2с1м
н2с1ок
нс2тал
нс4тк
нст3р
н2с1ур
н2с3ф
2н1т
4нт.
н3та
н4т3в
3нте2рн
нтик4
н2тр1аг
нт3рап
н2т2рат
нтр1ата
нт2род
нт2рос3
н3тст
н3ть
ну3
4нуш
2н1ф2
2н1х2
4нх.
4нхл
н1ц
2нц.
2нци
2нцм
2н2цт
н1ч
2нч.
н1ш
2нш.
3нша
2ншв
нш3л
нш2т
н1щ
2нь
6нь.
3ньб
3ньг
3ньї
3нь∙
3ньй
4ньк.
3ньм
4ньма
3ньо
ньос2
3ньс
3ньц
3ньч
4ньч.
3ньш
3нью
2нюч.
н'2
2о1а2
оант3
оа4р
о1б
о2б3г
о2бўд
обўл2
о4бк
1обкл
о3бл
об2лис
о4блў
об5ль
о3бо
1обсл
обс4т
о2бт
3о2б'1
о1в
о3вв
ов2вў
ов2до
овиз3н
овис3т
овў3дм
овў3дн
ов2ло
ов3ми
о2вним
овп3л
овс3т
ов2то
ов2тр
ов2чи
ов4чит
о2вш
2о3г
ог2в
ог2л
4ог4р
о1є
о1д
од2в
одек3л
од2ж
оди3сп
о3дм
о2дност
о3д2о
од2р
о2дч
2о1е2
ое4в
ое3з
ое3к3
ое4кр
ое3т
о1ї
о2їв
о2їг
о2їк
ої2м
о2їна
о2їр
о2їт
о1ж
о3ж2а
о2жч
2о3за
озабе3
оза∙3
оза2й
оз3д2
о1зда.
озў3л2
о3з4на
о3зни
озо3о
о2зь
оз'3
оз'ї4
о1ў4
оўнс5
о3∙
о∙да6л
о∙3дў
о∙2до
о∙4мц
о2йд
ой2мо
о2йт
о1к
ок2в
о2кг
ок2ла
ок1ли
ок3ляк
окоро1
4окр
ок1рий
ок2рил
окст4
2о3л
олес2
ол2ля
о4льк
о4льс
2о1м
о3ма
оманд1а
о2мб
о3мг
ом1ўнт
о2мним
4о3мо
ом2ру
о3мс
о4мф
о2мч
о1н
о3на
она4вч
онаг5н
она4дл
оназ3
она2й
онас3т
2онац
о2нб
онг2р
о4нд
о2нж
о3нл
о2нп
о3нта.
он2трал
о3нту.
о3нх
о2нш
о3нь
о1о2
о5ок
оо3па
ооп1р
оос1
оос3ф
оо3т
о2оте
о1п
о3пе
2опў
опўз5
4опл
оп2ли
оп2ло
опо∙3
опос3т
оприс3
оп2си
оп2сў
оп2су
о1р
ор1алг
ор1а2мў
о2ранг
орас2
о3рв
о2рг
ор3д
ореа3
орель1
орет2
ор1е2та
ори4сп
о4рк
оро1зш
ор4тв
о3ру
о3рх
о3рш
о1с
о2сб
о2с1во
о3сг
4о3си
2оск
ос2ко
ос3коч
оск1р
2о3с2л
ос4ль
ос4нет
ос2п
ос4па
оспос3
ос6тв
ос2теб
ос3тўл
ос3тн
ост3ри
ос2т2ру
о2стс
о3су
осупў1
о3сф
ос6хў
о1т
о3та
от2в
о3тў
отў2вц
о2тм
о3тн
о3то
от2р
отран3
от3рў
от4рўй
о3ту
о3ть3
о1у2
о2ум
оуп1
оу3сь
оут3
2о1ф
о2фм
оф2то
о1х
о2х1ато
ох1ел
ох3ло
ох3лю
ох3ля
о2х1ос
ох3ре
о1ц
о1ч
о1ш
ош3в
ош3ка
ош3кў
ош2лў
ош4ти
ошт3р
о1щ
о1ю
о2юр
о5я
оя4в
оя2гў
оя2д
оя2ру
п4а
5па.
па4нге
па2нз
па2нот
па3нц
па3нь
пас3л
пас1м
па2с3п
па3тл
п1д
пе2рб
переб2
пере2дн
перес2
пе2рз
пе2роб
пе3тл
пи3л
пил2о3
пи3т
пў2в1ў2
пў2вн
пў3вни
пў2во
пў2в'
пў2дн
пў3дня
пўдст3р
пў2дц
3пўй
3пўр
пў3рс
3пўс
3пў3т
п1к
п1л
п2ла
п4лат
п2лем
п3леш
п2лў
п4лўд
п3лўл
п3лўн
п3ло.
п3лу
п4ль
п3лю.
2п1м
3п1н
п3ни
по1
поб2
по3в
пов2ч
3под
под4р
пої3ди
поз4
по∙2
по∙4т
3пой2
пок2
пок3с
пол2л
по5мс3
по3нт
поп2
поп4р
поро1
пос2
пос4к
поск1л
пос4ла
пос4не
пос4ну
посп3р
пос3та.
пос3тў
пох2
пош2
2п1п
2пр.
п1ран
п2ре
прек2
при3в2
приз2
п1рил
прип2
прис2
п1рў
про3
п1роз
п2роп
п2ру
п1с
2пс.
п3са
п3си.
п3со
2пст
3псу
2псь
п3ся
п1т
4пт.
3пта
п4тв
2птр
3п3ту
пу3д
пук3л
пус5
п1ф2
п1ц
п1ч
2пч.
п1ш
п'2
п'я2тн
3ра.
рав3д
ра4вч
2раге
ра2ген
ра2їв
1раз
1ра∙
ра4йн
1рал
р2але
4р1а4льт
р1ангў
ран2са
ран2сц
ра3нц
3рапа
1рар
ра2так
р3б
4рб.
рб2ла
2рб2р
2р1в
4рв.
р3вен
р3вн
р1г
4рг.
р2гс
р1є
2р1д
рде4ль
р3до
рд2об
1ре
3ребк
ре5в
рев2т
ре4дб
ре2дзе
ре3дм
ре2д1о2с
ре2др
ре2дус
ре2дуч
ре3зв
3рене
ре1о
ре3ол
ре2ох
ре3р2
ре2сме
рес2тр
4ретї
рет2ра
р1ж
4рж.
р2жб
р2жд
р1з
2рз.
2рзь.
3ри.
риб2л
3рибц
2риб'
2риж
риз6на
ри∙2
ри3й
рикў3
3римн
1рин.
1рину
риро3
рис4не
рис4ну
ри3сп
рис3с
рит2р
рит4ч
3риф
1риц
рў1д
1рўз
1рў∙
2рў2м
рў3мл
1рўн
3рўнў
рўнф5
рў3о
рў4ом
рў4ос
рўр3
3рўш
1рўя
р1й
2р1к
4рк.
4ркўн
рк1л
р2кш
р1л
2рл.
2рлўн
2р5м
4рм.
4рмаж
рмос2
р1н
4рн.
рнас3
5рно
3рну.
2рнь.
3ро.
ров2ча
ров2чу
рог2
род2м
ро2дно
4рої.
ро2їю
роз1в
роз5д
ро2з3н
3розр
1ро∙
3роко
1рол
ро3м
ро3нт
роп2ри
2р1орг
рос2к
ро2см
рос2тиг
рос3то
рос4ф
рот4р
2р1п
рп3л
2р1р
2р1с
4рс.
4рсир
рс3к
4рст
рс2тар
рс3тн
4рсь
2р1т
4рт.
р3та
рт3в
р2тл
р2тм
р3тмо
р2т1об
рт3р
рт4ро
ртс4
р3ту
ру3бо
3рув
1руг
3руї
2руж
ру4зк
3ру∙
3руй
ру3л
2рум
ру3нь
2руп
3рую
2р1ф
2р1х
р1ц
2рц.
рци2с
2р2ць
2р3ч
4рч.
2р1ш
4рш.
рш3к
ршос4
р1щ
2рщ.
рю3
ря3в
1ряк
1рян
ря3с
1ряч
р'2
р'∙3с
са2ге
са2кц
2с1а2тл
с3б
2сбу
2с1ве
сво2ї
с5воюв
2с1г
с1д
с2е
себ2
сев3д
седоз3
се2й
сек3с
сес2л
с6ў
сў3вб
сў2мк
сў3нь
с1к
4ск.
3ска
3ске
3ски
с2кид
с2кип
3с2кл
ск1лят
3ско
с3код
скос4
с3кс
с3ку
2с2кх
с1л
2сл.
с2ла
с4лав
с3лас
с3ле
с3ли
с4лиз
с2лў
с4лўпу
с3лўс
с3лл
с2лу
2с2ль
4сль.
2см.
с3мен
с3мис
с3н
с4на
с4нўж
со3б
со3ї
со3м
сос3та
со2тр
3соф
с1п2
2сп.
с3па
с3пи
с2пўв
спў3во
спў3дн
с4пўн
3сплу
с6пок
сп3ре
сп3ру
с3пу
2с1р
2с1с
с3се
с4се.
с4сем
с4сет
с4сеш
с2су.
с3ся
с1т
4ст.
с2таб
с2тай
с2там
с2тану
с2танц
с2тас
с4тас.
с5тв
2ств.
2с2тг
с3тей
2сте2мб
с2теп
с4тиро
с4тўж
с2тўй
2с4т1ўм
с4тўн
2стўнф
с2тн
стовў3
с4току
с2тол.
с2толу
с2толь
2стп
2стр.
ст3руб
с3тс
с3тт
с4туля
2с2тф
2сть
3стьб
3стьм
3стьо
3с5тьс
3стю
с2тяг
су2бл
су4льс
су2ра
с2ург
с1ф
сфа3
с2фе
сх2
с1ха
с3хоч
с3ц
2с4ць
с1ш
с6ь
4сь.
3сьї
2ськ.
2ськв
2сьо
с6я3
2с'1
та2бл
2тав
3тавр
3таг
та3д
та2й
3тай.
та4йн
2таки
2тальт
2таля
3тамў
танў4з
3таннї
3таннў
тарос4
3тас
4таса
3татт
3тать
2тах
2тацў.
2тач
4тачал
2т1б
3т1в
6тв.
т3ва
т2ве
т3вен
т3ви
т1г
тга3
2т1д
тег1р
3тез
т1емб
те2мк
те3ом
те2ос
теп3л
3тер.
3тера
те2рб
3терк
те4ркл
3терн
3теро
3терц
тес3т
тет3р
те4ть
те2хо
тї3
тїс6
т1ж
2т1з6
3ти
4тигл
ти4лк
4тильо
ти2льс
ти4мч
тип4
4тирл
ти4рн
тиф2
3тў.
тўа3
2тўб
3тўї
3тў∙
4тўйк
4тўлю
тў2ок
3тўс
3тўт
3тўх
3тўш
3тўю
3тўя
3т3к
т4кан
т4кац
т5ко
т1л
2тл.
2тлў
т2лу
т1м
2тм.
2тмас
2тме
т1н
2тн.
2тна
3тне
т2ни.
3тну
т3нь
т3ня
тоб2
тобс5
3това
товс5
тов3ч
3тог
2тої
2то∙м
2то∙т
2то∙ш
2той
3т4ок
2толя
то3мб
то2мно
топ3ли
2топн
2торон
2тосо
тост2
тос2та
тос2тр
2тосу
тот4р
тох2
3тош
2тою
4тоя
2т1п2
т1р
4тр.
т2рав
т3рал
2т2рг
т3рд1
т2ре
т3ре.
т3рем
т3рен
треп1р
т2рив
т3рий
триф2
т2рищ
т4рўб
т5рўб.
т3рўї
т3рўй
2трўл
трў5льц
т2рўн
2трўт
т2рўч
2т2рн
т3ров
тро3д
трос2
3троф
т3роц
2троч
2трп
2трр
3труб
т2рунн
т2рь
трьо5м
т4ряс
2т3с
4тс.
3тсў
4тс2к
4тсо
2т3т
т4тс
3ту.
3тув
2туд
3туї
3тул
3тун
2туп
3тус
ту4ть
3тух
3тую
т1ф
т1х
т2ха
т2хл
т3ц
т1ч
2тч.
т3ча
т1ш
т1щ
2ть
4ть.
3тьб
3тьї
3тьк
3тьм
3тьо
5тьов
3тьс
3тю
5тюч
тя3
3тяк
3тян
2т'1
т'я2
у1а
у1б
убе3
у4бк
у2б1ор
уб3р
уб4рў
убс4
у2бт
у1в
увўб2
увў3з
увўй2
увў5л2
увўм2
у3вк
у3г
уг1р
уг3рўв.
у1д
уд2в
у3дд
у2дзь
удоб3
удов5ч
у1е
уе3н
уе4нт
у1ї
у1ж
у2жк
у3жмо
у1з
уз1в
уз2ви
уз3до
у1ў
у1∙
у∙4сть
у1к
укў3н
ук2л
ук3ле
укос4
ук1ру
у1л
у3ле
у3ли
у3лў
у3лк
у3л2л
у3льн
уль2то2
у3ля
у3м
у5мок
у5мп
ум2р
у4мс
у1н
у3на
у3нг
ун3дш
у3нса
уня3
у3о2
уо3з
у1п
упос3т
уприс4
у2пт
у1р
у2рб
у3р2в
ур3ва
ур3ве
у4рк
у3рм
у3рп
у3рр
у4рс
у3ру
у3рч
у3рш
у1с
у3са
усе1
уседо2
усеозб3
усес2
1у2сўм
уск1л
уск1р
ус4лў
ус2м
ус3п
ус3с
ус5та.
ус5тав.
ус2тал
уст3в
у3с3тў
уст3ре
ус5туп.
ус5тя
у3су
усу4р
у1т
у3та
у4т2в
ут3вў
у3те
ут3л
ут2р
ут3ре
ут3рў
ут3ро
ут3ря
уть1
у1у
уу4мн
уу5му
у3ф
уф5л
у1х
ух1в
у1ц
у2цт
у1ч
уч2ва
у1ш
ушў3с
уш3л
у1щ
у1ю
у1я2
уя3ва
уя3ви
ф1г
фе1
фе3о
фе2рб
3фў
фў5а
фў2зма
фў3л
фў3о
2ф1к
ф3л
ф4ля
ф1м
2фм.
2фма
3фма.
ф1н
фоб2
фок2
фо3нт
ф1р
2фр.
ф2раз
ф3рат
фре2й
ф3рит
фро3
2ф1с
ф1т
2фт.
2фть
ф1ц
2ф1ш
ха4в3ч
2х1ак
ха2кт
ха2том
х1б
2хв.
х1вар
х1ве
х1ви
х2вил
х1вя
2х1г
2х1д
хе∙3
хе2л
хе3н
хи3л
5хў
хў1дл
хў3дц
хў3ї2
хў2мк
хў3нд
х1к
х1л
х3ла
х2ло
х2лю
х1м
х2ме
х2му
х3мя
х1н
2хно
х3нь
2х1об
3ход
3хор
хор2е
хо2сн
хос3т
хостў3
хоф2
1хоч
2х1п
х1ра
х2ре
х3рен
х1ри
хрис3
2х1рў
х1рю
х1ря
2х1с
хсо2
хс2т
х1т
2хт.
хтоз6
хт4с
х1ц
х1ч
2х'1
х'я2
1ца
2ц1г
ц1д
1це
цег1л
цек2р
це3о
2ц1з
1ци
цик1л
ци3нц
ци3т
1цў
цў2вн
цў1д
ц1к
2цка
ц1л
2ц1м
ц1н
1цо
2ц1р
ц1с2
1ц1т
цу3
цук3р
цу4ль
1ц1ц
4ць.
1цьк
1цьо
1цю3
1ця3
3чан
ч1б
ч1в
чва3
че2рг
че3сь
ч1ж
3чи.
чи2зб
3чий
чик3
чи4мр
чис3л
3чиц
ч1к
ч1л
ч2ле
ч1м
ч1н
3чог
3чос
2ч1р
ч1с
ч1т
2чт.
чу3б
чу3в
чуп1
чх2
ч1ц
2ч1ч
ша4ль
2ш1б
2шв.
ш1ве
ш1г
ше3з
шў2
шў3в
шў3нц
ш1к2
2шк.
ш3ки
ш2кў3
ш4кўл
шкў4рц
шк3л
шк3н
ш2ко
ш3коп
ш2кр
шку3
ш2кур
ш1л
ш2ле
ш3лем
ш4ли.
ш4ль
ш2лю
ш1м
2шм.
ш3н
2шним
3шну
шо2т
ш1п4
ш1р
ш1с
ш1т2
2шт.
ш3тс
ш3ц
ш1ш
ще3з
щез2г
щў2м
щ1н
що1
щод4
що3й
щох2
щ1с
ь1б
ь1в
ь2во
ь1г
ь1д
ьї3
ь1з
ь1й
ь1к
ь2кв
ь2кк
ь1м
ь1н
ьод2
ьок2
ьо2хе
ьо2хл
ьо2хм
ьо2хо
ьо2хт
ьоя2
ь1п
ь1р
ь1с
ь1т
ь2т1ам
ь2тм
ьт3р
ь2тф
ь1ф
ь1х
ь2ху
ь1ц
ь1ч
ь1ш2
ь1щ
ю1а
ю1б
ю3бк
юб'2
ю3в
ю1г
ю1д
ю3дд
ю3дк
ю3дь
ю1ї
ю1ж
ю1з
юзў3
ю1∙
ю2й
ю1к
ю3л
ю3м
ю1н
ю3нд
ю3нт
ю1о
ю1п
ю3р
юр2аль
ю4рг
ю5рка
ю4рмо
ю5ро
ю4рп
ю4рр
ю1с
юскў3
юс3л
юс5н
ю3сс
ю3ста
ю1т
ю3тт
ю1ф
ю1х
ю1ц
ю1ч
ю1ш
ю1щ
ю1ю
я1б
я1в
я4вк
я2вл
я2вн
я2ву
я3в3ч
я1г
я1д
я3да
я3дд
я2дер
я3ди
я4дк
я1ї
я3ж
я1з
я2зз
я2зь
я1∙
я4й
я5йо
я1к
я4кд
я2кўс
як1л
як1р
я5ку
я4кч
я3л
я3м
я1н
я3нд
я3нк
я3но
янос2
я4нс
я3ня
я1о4
я1п
я1р
я3рв
1ярду
я3рк
я4рс
я1с
яс3л
яс4ло
я2с5н
4ясо
ясо∙2
я3сс
4ясу
я1т
ят3в
я1у
я1х
яхо3
я1ц
я1ч
я1ш
я1щ
я1ю
я1я
'3їв
'1їд
'ї4мн
'ї4му
'2ў
'1∙2
'2ю
'3ю2д
'3ю4р
'5я2б
'4яв
'я3вл
'янос4
}
